Hawaii, session 2025, SB1645.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 431:14G, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§431:14G-     Contracts; physicians; fee for service plans.  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, after December 31, 2025, each new or renewed contract between a mutual benefit society and a physician for a fee for service plan shall provide for: (1)  The reimbursement of the physician's increased overhead costs, cost of living increases, and increased costs caused by inflation; and (2)  An increase of ten per cent in the rate for reimbursement of services after each five-year period that the physician is in service." SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________